Arkansas, session 2025, HB1587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-203(d), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" under the Patient Protection Act of 1995, is amended to
read as follows:
(d) "Healthcare provider" means those individuals or entities licensed
by the State of Arkansas to provide healthcare services, limited to the
following:
(1) Advanced practice nurses;
(2) Athletic trainers;
(3) Audiologists;
(4) Certified behavioral health providers;
(5) Certified orthotists;
(6) Chiropractors;
(7) Community mental health centers or clinics;
(8) Dentists;
(9) Home health care;
(10) Hospice care;
*ANS132*
02/25/2025 1:21:55 PM ANS132

HB1587
(11) Hospital-based services;
(12) Hospitals;
(13) Licensed ambulatory surgery centers;
(14) Licensed certified social workers;
(15) Licensed dieticians;
(16) Licensed intellectual and developmental disabilities
service providers;
(17) Licensed professional counselors;
(18) Licensed psychological examiners;
(19) Long-term care facilities;
(20) Occupational therapists;
(21) Optometrists;
(22) Pharmacists and pharmacies;
(23) Physical therapists;
(24) Physicians and surgeons (M.D. and D.O.);
(25) Podiatrists;
(26) Prosthetists;
(27) Psychologists;
(28) Respiratory therapists;
(29) Rural health clinics; and
(30) Speech pathologists.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-802(4), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" as used under the any willing provider laws, is amended
to read as follows:
(4) "Healthcare provider" or “provider” means those individuals
or entities licensed by the State of Arkansas to provide healthcare services,
limited to the following:
(A) Advanced practice nurses;
(B) Athletic trainers;
(C) Audiologists;
(D) Certified behavioral health providers;
(E) Certified orthotists;
(F) Chiropractors;
(G) Community mental health centers or clinics;
(H) Dentists;
02/25/2025 1:21:55 PM ANS132

HB1587
(I) Home health care;
(J) Hospice care;
(K) Hospital-based services;
(L) Hospitals;
(M) Licensed ambulatory surgery centers;
(N) Licensed certified social workers;
(O) Licensed dieticians;
(P) Licensed durable medical equipment providers;
(Q) Licensed intellectual and developmental disabilities
service providers;
(R) Licensed professional counselors;
(S) Licensed psychological examiners;
(T) Long-term care facilities;
(U) Occupational therapists;
(V) Optometrists;
(W) Pharmacists and pharmacies;
(X) Physical therapists;
(Y) Physicians and surgeons (M.D. and D.O.);
(Z) Podiatrists;
(AA) Prosthetists;
(BB) Psychologists;
(CC) Respiratory therapists;
(DD) Rural health clinics;
(EE) Speech pathologists; and
(FF) Other healthcare practitioners as determined by the
State Insurance Department in rules promulgated under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;









02/25/2025 1:21:55 PM ANS132